Washington statutes.
RCW 2.28.320

Law enforcement actions in court facilities—Completion of information form—Notice to court staff.

(1) The governmental entity responsible for the security of a court facility, using the form described in subsection (2) of this section, shall collect the name of the law enforcement officer, agency, date, time, specific law enforcement purpose, and the proposed law enforcement action to be taken by all on-duty state and federal law enforcement officers, including plain-clothed officers, entering court facilities, unless such officer's purpose is to participate in a case or proceeding before the court. Completed forms must be immediately transmitted to the appropriate court staff. Information collected must not include personal identifying information concerning the individuals who were the target of the law enforcement action, and to the extent such individuals are identified, they must be identified by the initials of their first and last names. Completed forms must be transmitted to the administrative office of the courts on a monthly basis.

(2) The administrative office of the court [courts] shall develop a standard form to collect the information in subsection (1) of this section. The form must be developed no later than July 1, 2020. The administrative office of the courts shall publish a quarterly report of the information collected in subsection (1) of this section beginning October 1, 2020.

(3) Designated court staff must be notified without delay if a law enforcement agent covered by this section is present in the court facility with the intent of conducting a civil arrest.

[ 2020 c 37 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—Short title—2020 c 37: See notes following RCW 2.28.300.